Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act:
(1) "Mental health professional" means any of the following:
(a) A physician licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or a medical officer of the
government of the United States engaged in conducting mental health
services;
(b) A psychiatrist licensed under KRS Chapter 311 or a medical officer of the
government of the United States engaged in conducting mental health
services;
(c) A psychologist, psychological practitioner, certified psychologist, or
psychological associate licensed under KRS Chapter 319;
(d) A psychiatric advanced practice registered nurse, or a certified nurse
practitioner or clinical nurse specialist with a psychiatric or mental health
population focus who is licensed under KRS Chapter 314 to engage in
advanced practice nursing;
(e) A licensed clinical social worker or a certified social worker licensed under
KRS Chapter 335;
(f) A marriage and family therapist licensed under KRS Chapter 335 or a
marriage and family therapy associate holding a permit under KRS Chapter
335;
(g) A licensed professional clinical counselor or a licensed professional
counselor associate credentialed under KRS Chapter 335;
(h) A licensed pastoral counselor licensed under KRS Chapter 335;
(i) A licensed professional art therapist certified under KRS Chapter 309;
(j) A physician assistant licensed under KRS Chapter 311 engaged in providing
mental health services; and
(k) A licensed clinical alcohol and drug counselor, licensed clinical alcohol and
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
drug counselor associate, or certified alcohol and drug counselor licensed
or certified under KRS Chapter 309; and
(2) "Sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts":
(a) Means any practices by a mental health professional that seek to direct a
patient toward a predetermined sexual orientation or gender identity
outcome, including efforts to direct a patient toward a particular:
1. Sexual orientation by eliminating, reducing, or discouraging sexual or
romantic attractions or feelings toward individuals of a particular sex;
2. Sexual orientation by creating, promoting, or encouraging sexual or
romantic attractions or feelings toward individuals of a particular sex;
or
3. Gender identity by eliminating, reducing, discouraging, or promoting
any particular gender identity or gender expression; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Counseling or therapy that provides assistance to a person undergoing
gender transition;
2. Nondirective psychotherapies that facilitate a person's coping, identity
exploration, and self-understanding without seeking to achieve any
particular outcome regarding sexual orientation or gender identity;
3. Counseling or therapy that is neutral with respect to sexual
orientation and gender identity and that does not seek to direct a
person toward a predetermined outcome; or
4. Age-appropriate interventions to address unlawful conduct or unsafe
practices that do not seek to direct a person toward any particular
sexual orientation or gender identity.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
(1) A civil action may be maintained under this section for damages arising from
sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts against any:
(a) Mental health professional;
(b) Person or entity that employed, supervised, or otherwise exercised authority
over a mental health professional in which the person or entity:
1. Knew or had reason to know that the mental health professional
engaged in or was likely to engage in sexual orientation or gender
identity change efforts; and
2. Failed to take reasonable steps to prevent the mental health
professional from engaging in sexual orientation or gender identity
change efforts; or
(c) Person or entity for the negligent hiring, supervision, or retention of a
mental health professional who engaged in sexual orientation or gender
identity change efforts.
(2) The action may be filed in the Circuit Court for the county where the alleged
harm occurred or the county where the plaintiff resides.
(3) An individual found liable under this section shall be jointly and severally liable
with each other person, if any, found liable under this section for the damages
arising from the same harm.
(4) In an action under this section, the plaintiff may recover damages including but
not limited to:
(a) Economic damages, including medical expenses, mental health treatment
costs, lost earnings, and other pecuniary losses;
(b) Noneconomic damages, including pain and suffering, emotional distress,
and loss of enjoyment of life;
(c) Punitive or exemplary damages, where the defendant's conduct was willful,
wanton, oppressive, fraudulent, or malicious; and
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
(d) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
(5) (a) A cause of action under this section shall survive the death of the person
who was subjected to sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts
and may be maintained by the person's personal representative or estate.
(b) The person's personal representative or estate may recover all damages
available under subsection (4) of this section, including punitive or
exemplary damages where the requirements of subsection (4)(c) of this
section are met.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In an action under Section 2 of this Act, causation may be established as follows:
(a) 1. General causation may be established by expert testimony, scientific
literature, or other evidence demonstrating that sexual orientation or
gender identity change efforts are capable of causing the type of
psychological injury or illness suffered by the plaintiff.
2. Expert testimony may address:
a. The scientific and clinical consensus regarding the harmfulness
of sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts;
b. The types of psychological injuries commonly caused by sexual
orientation or gender identity change efforts;
c. The typical latency period between sexual orientation or gender
identity change efforts and the manifestation or recognition of
psychological harm; and
d. The reasons why survivors of sexual orientation or gender
identity change efforts commonly experience delayed recognition
of harm, including repression, shame, and the dynamics of the
therapeutic relationship;
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
(b) 1. Once general causation is established as described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the plaintiff may establish specific causation by
demonstrating that the sexual orientation or gender identity change
efforts were, in reasonable medical probability, a substantial factor in
causing the plaintiff's psychological injury or illness.
2. The existence of other potential contributing factors does not preclude
a finding of causation if the trier of fact determines that the sexual
orientation or gender identity change efforts substantially contributed
to the harm.
3. The plaintiff shall not be required to prove that the sexual orientation
or gender identity change efforts were the sole cause of the harm, to
the exclusion of all other potential contributing factors; and
(c) The plaintiff shall not be required to prove the precise mechanism by which
the harm occurred in order to establish causation.
(2) In determining whether sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts were
a substantial factor in causing the plaintiff's injury, the trier of fact may
consider:
(a) The nature, duration, and intensity of the efforts;
(b) The age and vulnerability of the plaintiff;
(c) The relationship between the plaintiff and the mental health professional;
(d) The temporal relationship between the efforts and the onset or exacerbation
of symptoms; and
(e) Any other relevant factors.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Sections 1 to 4 of this Act shall not be construed to limit or restrict any other
statutory or common law cause of action or remedy available to any person
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
injured by sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly that Sections 1 to 4 of this Act shall be
interpreted broadly to effectuate its remedial purpose of providing civil remedies
to persons harmed by sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts.
(3) Sections 1 to 4 of this Act apply to any action commenced on or after the effective
date of this Act, provided that the action was not barred by the applicable statute
of limitations in effect prior to the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 413 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the time for commencement of a
civil action for recovery of damages suffered as a result of sexual orientation or
gender identity change efforts as described in Sections 1 to 4 of this Act is the
later of the following:
(a) Within twenty-two (22) years of the date the plaintiff attains the age of
majority, if the plaintiff was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time of
the conduct;
(b) Within ten (10) years of the date of the last treatment session in which
sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts occurred, if the plaintiff
was eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time of the conduct; or
(c) Within five (5) years of the date the plaintiff discovers or reasonably should
have discovered that psychological injury or illness occurring after the
conduct was caused by sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts.
(2) For purposes of applying the discovery provisions of this section:
(a) The plaintiff shall be deemed to have discovered that psychological injury or
illness was caused by sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts
when the plaintiff first knew or reasonably should have known that the
psychological injury or illness was caused, in whole or in part, by sexual
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
orientation or gender identity change efforts;
(b) The plaintiff need not have knowledge of the full extent of the injury, the
specific diagnosis, or that the conduct was wrongful or actionable;
(c) Knowledge that the plaintiff received treatment from a mental health
professional, by itself, does not constitute discovery; and
(d) The discovery period commences only when the plaintiff knew or
reasonably should have known that psychological injury or illness generally
was caused by sexual orientation or gender identity change efforts.
Evidence that the plaintiff was aware of one (1) psychological symptom or
condition potentially caused by those efforts, or had made a connection
between the efforts and any specific symptom, does not establish discovery
of other injuries or the full scope of harm.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit the application of any other provision
of law that extends the time for commencement of an action as described in
Section 2 of this Act.
(4) (a) Notwithstanding KRS 411.140, if the person who was subjected to sexual
orientation or gender identity change efforts dies before the expiration of
the applicable statute of limitations period under subsection (1) of this
section, the personal representative or estate shall have the later of:
1. The time remaining under subsection (1) of this section; or
2. One (1) year from the date of qualification of the personal
representative.
(b) For purposes of applying the discovery provisions of this section, discovery
by the personal representative or estate of the causal connection between
the decedent's death or psychological injury or illness and sexual
orientation or gender identity change efforts shall be treated as discovery by
the plaintiff.
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
Section 6. KRS 413.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following actions shall be commenced within one (1) year after the cause of
action accrued:
(a) An action for an injury to the person of the plaintiff, or of her husband, his
wife, child, ward, apprentice, or servant;
(b) An action for injuries to persons, cattle, or other livestock by railroads or
other corporations, with the exception of hospitals licensed pursuant to KRS
Chapter 216;
(c) An action for malicious prosecution, conspiracy, arrest, seduction, criminal
conversation, or breach of promise of marriage;
(d) An action for libel or slander;
(e) An action against a physician, surgeon, dentist, or hospital licensed pursuant
to KRS Chapter 216, for negligence or malpractice, except as provided in
Sections 4 and 5 of this Act;
(f) A civil action, arising out of any act or omission in rendering, or failing to
render, professional services for others, whether brought in tort or contract,
against a real estate appraiser holding a certificate or license issued under
KRS Chapter 324A or a real estate broker or sales associate holding a license
issued under KRS Chapter 324;
(g) An action for the escape of a prisoner, arrested or imprisoned on civil process;
(h) An action for the recovery of usury paid for the loan or forbearance of money
or other thing, against the loaner or forbearer or assignee of either;
(i) An action for the recovery of stolen property, by the owner thereof against
any person having the same in his possession;
(j) An action for the recovery of damages or the value of stolen property, against
the thief or any accessory;
(k) An action arising out of a detention facility disciplinary proceeding, whether
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
based upon state or federal law;
(l) An action for damages arising out of a deficiency, defect, omission, error, or
miscalculation in any survey or plat, whether brought in tort or contract,
against a licensed professional land surveyor holding a license under KRS
Chapter 322;
(m) An action for violating KRS 311.782; and
(n) An action for violating KRS 311.731.
(2) In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (e) of subsection (1) of this section,
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time the injury is first
discovered or in the exercise of reasonable care should have been discovered;
provided that such action shall be commenced within five (5) years from the date on
which the alleged negligent act or omission is said to have occurred.
(3) In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (f) or (l) of subsection (1) of this
section, the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue within one (1) year from the
date of the occurrence or from the date when the cause of action was, or reasonably
should have been, discovered by the party injured.
(4) In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of this section,
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time of payment. This limitation
shall apply to all payments made on all demands, whether evidenced by writing or
existing only in parol.
(5) In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of this section,
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time the property is found by its
owner.
(6) In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (j) of subsection (1) of this section,
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue at the time of discovery of the
liability.
(7) In respect to the action referred to in paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of this section,
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2334
the cause of action shall be deemed to accrue on the date an appeal of the
disciplinary proceeding is decided by the institutional warden.
(8) In respect to the action referred to in subsection (1)(m) and (n) of this section, the
cause of action shall be deemed to accrue after the performance or inducement or
attempt to perform or induce the abortion.
Section 7. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Section 8. Whereas Kentucky has a paramount interest in protecting its
population from the harmful effects of sexual orientation or gender identity change
efforts, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and
approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 2/25/2026 10:44 AM Jacketed